Colorado, session 2025B, SB25B-009.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. Legislative declaration. (1) The general assembly
finds and declares that:
(a) The Taxpayer's Bill of Rights (TABOR) is a critical
constitutional safeguard that ensures Colorado taxpayers are protected
-3- SB25B-009

from excessive taxation and that government revenue remains within
responsible limits;
(b) TABOR imposes strict limitations on the ability of the state
and local governments to raise taxes, requires voter approval for any new
tax or tax increase, and ensures that revenue is not collected in excess of
the state's allowed cap;
(c) Colorado's government is committed to maintaining the
principles of fiscal responsibility and transparency, ensuring that taxpayer
dollars are spent efficiently and effectively;
(d) Pausing tax credits is allowable up to the constitutional
mandated cap and may constitute a temporary reduction in expenditures
rather than an increase in taxes, as most tax credits are considered a form
of expenditure by the state, reducing the amount of tax revenue that
would otherwise be collected; and
(e) Such a pause in tax credits does not increase the overall tax
burden on taxpayers and does not require voter approval under TABOR,
as it is consistent with the constitutional intent to limit state spending
rather than to impose new taxes or tax increases.
(2) Therefore, the general assembly finds and declares that the
temporary suspension or reduction of tax credits is within the legal
authority of the general assembly and does not constitute a violation of
TABOR, as it represents a reduction in state expenditures rather than an
increase in taxes.
SECTION 2. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 39-22-130, amend
(10) as follows:
39-22-130. Family affordability tax credit - tax preference
performance statement - legislative declaration - definitions - repeal.
-4- SB25B-009

(10) (a) (I) The FOR THE INCOME TAX YEAR COMMENCING ON OR AFTER
JANUARY 1, 2024, BUT BEFORE JANUARY 1, 2025, THE amount of the
credit allowed under this section that exceeds the resident individual's
income taxes due is refunded to the individual.
(II) THIS SUBSECTION (10)(a) IS REPEALED, EFFECTIVE JANUARY
1, 2027.
(b) FOR INCOME TAX YEARS COMMENCING ON OR AFTER JANUARY
1, 2025, BUT BEFORE JANUARY 1, 2034, THE AMOUNT OF THE CREDIT
ALLOWED UNDER THIS SECTION THAT EXCEEDS THE RESIDENT
INDIVIDUAL'S INCOME TAXES DUE IS NOT REFUNDED TO THE INDIVIDUAL.
SECTION 3. In Colorado Revised Statutes, add 39-22-131 as
follows:
39-22-131. Temporary tax credit suspension - prorating -
insufficient revenues - rules - definitions. (1) AS USED IN THIS SECTION,
UNLESS THE CONTEXT OTHERWISE REQUIRES:
(a) "APPLICABLE INCOME TAX YEAR" MEANS THE INCOME TAX
YEAR FOLLOWING THE JUNE, SEPTEMBER, AND DECEMBER REVENUE
FORECASTS PREPARED BY THE LEGISLATIVE COUNCIL STAFF AND THE
OFFICE OF STATE PLANNING AND BUDGETING AND ANY INTERIM REVENUE
ESTIMATE.
(b) "EXCESS STATE REVENUES" MEANS THE TOTAL AMOUNT OF
REVENUE COLLECTED BY THE STATE DURING THE STATE FISCAL YEAR IN
EXCESS OF THE LIMITATION ON STATE FISCAL YEAR SPENDING IMPOSED BY
SECTION 20 (7)(a) OF ARTICLE X OF THE STATE CONSTITUTION THAT
VOTERS STATEWIDE HAVE NOT AUTHORIZED THE STATE TO RETAIN AND
SPEND AND THAT THE STATE IS REQUIRED TO REFUND UNDER SECTION 20
(7)(d) OF ARTICLE X OF THE STATE CONSTITUTION, INCLUDING ANY
-5- SB25B-009

ADJUSTMENT FOR AMOUNTS SPECIFIED IN SECTION 24-77-103.7 OR
24-77-103.8, LESS THE MAXIMUM AMOUNTS THAT MAY BE REFUNDED
PURSUANT TO SECTIONS 39-1-104.6, 39-3-209, AND 39-22-627 FOR THE
PROPERTY TAX AND INCOME TAX YEARS THAT COMMENCED DURING THE
STATE FISCAL YEAR.
(c) "INCOME TAX CREDIT" MEANS ANY CREDIT ALLOWED TO A
TAXPAYER AGAINST THE INCOME TAXES IMPOSED BY THIS ARTICLE 22.
"INCOME TAX CREDIT" DOES NOT INCLUDE:
(I) THE COLORADO AFFORDABLE HOUSING TAX CREDIT ALLOWED
IN PART 21 OF THIS ARTICLE 22; AND
(II) THE EARNED INCOME TAX CREDITS ALLOWED IN SECTIONS
39-22-123 AND 39-22-123.5.
(d) "INTERIM REVENUE ESTIMATE" MEANS AN UPDATED REVENUE
ESTIMATE IN THE TIME BETWEEN TWO ESTIMATES MADE BY THE
GOVERNOR PURSUANT TO SECTION 24-75-201.3 (2), WHICH INTERIM
ESTIMATE IS PREPARED BY THE GOVERNOR, DESIGNATED BY THE
GOVERNOR AS AN INTERIM REVENUE ESTIMATE THAT IS AN UPDATE TO THE
MOST RECENT PRIOR REVENUE ESTIMATE, AND TRANSMITTED TO THE
GENERAL ASSEMBLY.
(e) "STATE REVENUE ESTIMATE WITH FULL INCOME TAX CREDITS"
MEANS AN ESTIMATE OF THE AMOUNT OF EXCESS STATE REVENUES IN THE
STATE FISCAL YEAR DURING WHICH THE INCOME TAX YEAR BEGINS,
ASSUMING THAT ALL INCOME TAX CREDITS ARE FULLY AVAILABLE FOR THE
APPLICABLE INCOME TAX YEAR.
(f) "STATE REVENUE ESTIMATE WITHOUT INCOME TAX CREDITS"
MEANS AN ESTIMATE OF THE AMOUNT OF EXCESS STATE REVENUES IN THE
STATE FISCAL YEAR DURING WHICH THE INCOME TAX YEAR BEGINS,
-6- SB25B-009

ASSUMING THAT NO INCOME TAX CREDITS ARE AVAILABLE FOR THE
APPLICABLE INCOME TAX YEAR.
(2) (a) BEGINNING WITH THE QUARTERLY DECEMBER 2025
FORECAST, AND EACH QUARTERLY JUNE, SEPTEMBER, OR DECEMBER
REVENUE FORECAST THEREAFTER, THE LEGISLATIVE COUNCIL STAFF AND
THE OFFICE OF STATE PLANNING AND BUDGETING SHALL INCLUDE A STATE
REVENUE ESTIMATE WITH COMPLETE INCOME TAX CREDITS AND A STATE
REVENUE ESTIMATE WITHOUT INCOME TAX CREDITS.
(b) THE GOVERNOR SHALL INCLUDE IN EACH INTERIM REVENUE
ESTIMATE A STATE REVENUE ESTIMATE WITH COMPLETE INCOME TAX
CREDITS AND A STATE REVENUE ESTIMATE WITHOUT INCOME TAX CREDITS.
(3) NOTWITHSTANDING ANY PROVISION OF LAW TO THE
CONTRARY, THE AVAILABILITY OF INCOME TAX CREDITS FOR THE
APPLICABLE INCOME TAX YEAR IS DETERMINED BY WHICH INCOME TAX
CREDIT ESTIMATE REQUIRED BY SUBSECTION (2) OF THIS SECTION RESULTS
IN THE LEAST AMOUNT OF EXCESS STATE REVENUE. IF THE MOST RECENT
QUARTERLY JUNE, SEPTEMBER, OR DECEMBER REVENUE FORECAST, AS
PREPARED BY THE LEGISLATIVE COUNCIL STAFF AND THE OFFICE OF STATE
PLANNING AND BUDGETING, OR THE MOST RECENT INTERIM REVENUE
ESTIMATE, SHOWS THAT:
(a) THE STATE REVENUE ESTIMATE WITHOUT INCOME TAX CREDITS
RESULTS IN THE LEAST AMOUNT OF EXCESS STATE REVENUE OF THE
INCOME TAX CREDIT ESTIMATES, THEN NO INCOME TAX CREDITS ARE
AVAILABLE FOR THE APPLICABLE INCOME TAX YEAR; OR
(b) THE STATE REVENUE ESTIMATE WITH FULL INCOME TAX
CREDITS RESULTS IN THE LEAST AMOUNT OF EXCESS STATE REVENUE OF
THE INCOME TAX CREDIT ESTIMATES, THEN ALL INCOME TAX CREDITS ARE
-7- SB25B-009

AVAILABLE FOR THE APPLICABLE INCOME TAX YEAR AND ARE PRORATED
SO THAT THE MAXIMUM TOTAL AMOUNT OF EACH INCOME TAX CREDIT
CLAIMED BY ALL TAXPAYERS CLAIMING THAT CREDIT DOES NOT EXCEED
THE AMOUNT EQUAL TO THE ESTIMATED EXCESS STATE REVENUE DIVIDED
BY THE TOTAL NUMBER OF INCOME TAX CREDITS AVAILABLE DURING THE
APPLICABLE INCOME TAX YEAR OR THE AMOUNT.
SECTION 4. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 39-22-550, amend
(3)(a), (4), (5), and (6); and add (4.3) and (4.5) as follows:
39-22-550. Tax credit for reducing emissions from certain
lawn equipment - sale of tax credits - authorization to issue - tax
preference performance statement - legislative declaration -
definitions - report - repeal. (3) (a) For income tax years commencing
on or after January 1, 2024, but before January 1, 2027 JANUARY 1, 2026,
a retailer qualified pursuant to subsection (3)(e)(II) of this section is
allowed a tax credit against the tax imposed pursuant to this article 22 in
an amount equal to thirty-three percent of the aggregate purchase price
for all retail sales of new, electric-powered lawn equipment that the
qualified retailer sold in the state during the tax year.
(4) If a credit authorized by SUBSECTION (3) OF this section
exceeds the income tax due on the income of the qualified retailer for the
taxable year, the excess credit may not be carried forward and must be
refunded to the qualified retailer.
(4.3) THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY FINDS AND DECLARES THAT:
(a) THE TAX CREDITS AUTHORIZED BY SUBSECTION (4.5) OF THIS
SECTION AS A METHOD TO PROVIDE MONEY TO THE GENERAL FUND ARE
AVAILABLE ONLY TO QUALIFIED RETAILERS THAT INCUR INCOME TAX
LIABILITY IN THE STATE;
-8- SB25B-009

(b) THE TAX CREDITS CAN ONLY BE USED BY A QUALIFIED
RETAILER TO OFFSET INCOME TAX LIABILITY ACTUALLY INCURRED BY THE
RETAILER;
(c) THE TAX CREDITS ARE NOT REFUNDABLE AND DO NOT IMPOSE
AN OBLIGATION OF PAYMENT IN ANY FUTURE YEAR UPON THE STATE;
(d) THE USE OF PROCEEDS FROM THE SALE OF THE TAX CREDITS
FOR THE GENERAL FUND ALLOWS THE STATE TO AUGMENT THE GENERAL
FUND THROUGH THE USE OF FUTURE TAX EXPENDITURES AND THEREFORE:
(I) DOES NOT REQUIRE THE STATE TO BORROW MONEY, EXTEND OR
PLEDGE THE STATE'S CREDIT, OR OBLIGATE THE STATE TO MAKE FUTURE
PAYMENTS FROM STATE REVENUES; AND
(II) DOES NOT OTHERWISE CREATE ANY MULTIPLE FISCAL YEAR
DIRECT OR INDIRECT DISTRICT DEBT OR OTHER FINANCIAL OBLIGATION
WHATSOEVER FOR PURPOSES OF SECTION 20 (4)(a) OF ARTICLE X OF THE
STATE CONSTITUTION.
(4.5) (a) A QUALIFIED RETAILER MAY PURCHASE TAX CREDITS
FROM THE DEPARTMENT IN ACCORDANCE WITH THIS SECTION AND MAY
APPLY THE TAX CREDITS AGAINST ITS LIABILITY FOR THE TAX IMPOSED
PURSUANT TO THIS ARTICLE 22, IN ACCORDANCE WITH THIS SUBSECTION
(4.5).
(b) (I) THE DEPARTMENT IS AUTHORIZED TO ISSUE TAX CREDIT
CERTIFICATES TO QUALIFIED RETAILERS EQUAL TO THE LESSER OF A TOTAL
FACE VALUE OF UP TO FORTY MILLION DOLLARS OR TOTAL SALES
PROCEEDS OF UP TO THIRTY MILLION DOLLARS IN FISCAL YEAR 2025-26.
(II) THE DEPARTMENT MAY CONTRACT WITH AN INDEPENDENT
THIRD PARTY TO CONDUCT OR CONSULT ON A BIDDING PROCESS AMONG
QUALIFIED RETAILERS TO PURCHASE THE TAX CREDITS.
-9- SB25B-009

(c) A QUALIFIED RETAILER SEEKING TO PURCHASE TAX CREDITS
MUST APPLY TO THE DEPARTMENT IN THE MANNER PRESCRIBED BY THE
DEPARTMENT.
(d) USING PROCEDURES ADOPTED BY THE DEPARTMENT OR, IF
APPLICABLE, BY AN INDEPENDENT THIRD PARTY, EACH QUALIFIED
RETAILER THAT SUBMITS AN APPLICATION SHALL MAKE A TIMELY AND
IRREVOCABLE OFFER, CONTINGENT ONLY UPON THE DEPARTMENT'S
ISSUANCE TO THE QUALIFIED RETAILER OF THE TAX CREDIT CERTIFICATES,
TO MAKE A SPECIFIED PURCHASE PAYMENT AMOUNT TO THE DEPARTMENT
ON DATES SPECIFIED BY THE DEPARTMENT. THE OFFER MUST INCLUDE THE
FOLLOWING:
(I) THE REQUESTED AMOUNT OF TAX CREDITS, WHICH MUST NOT
BE LESS THAN ANY MINIMUM AMOUNT ESTABLISHED IN PROCEDURES BY
THE DEPARTMENT OR, IF APPLICABLE, THE INDEPENDENT THIRD PARTY;
(II) THE QUALIFIED RETAILER'S PROPOSED TAX CREDIT PURCHASE
AMOUNT FOR EACH TAX CREDIT DOLLAR REQUESTED. THE MINIMUM
PROPOSED TAX CREDIT PURCHASE AMOUNT MUST BE EITHER:
(A) THE PERCENTAGE OF THE REQUESTED DOLLAR AMOUNT OF TAX
CREDITS THAT THE DEPARTMENT OR, IF APPLICABLE, THE INDEPENDENT
THIRD PARTY DETERMINES TO BE CONSISTENT WITH MARKET CONDITIONS
AS OF THE OFFER DATE; OR
(B) IF NO AMOUNT IS ESTABLISHED BY THE DEPARTMENT OR THE
INDEPENDENT THIRD PARTY PURSUANT TO SUBSECTION (4.5)(d)(II)(A) OF
THIS SECTION, SEVENTY-FIVE PERCENT OF THE REQUESTED DOLLAR
AMOUNT OF TAX CREDITS; AND
(III) ANY OTHER INFORMATION THAT THE DEPARTMENT OR, IF
APPLICABLE, THE INDEPENDENT THIRD PARTY REQUIRES.
-10- SB25B-009

(e) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL PROVIDE WRITTEN NOTICE TO EACH
QUALIFIED RETAILER THAT SUBMITS AN APPLICATION INDICATING
WHETHER OR NOT THE QUALIFIED RETAILER HAS BEEN APPROVED AS A
PURCHASER OF TAX CREDITS AND, IF SO, THE AMOUNT OF TAX CREDITS
ALLOCATED AND THE DATE BY WHICH PAYMENT OF THE TAX CREDIT SALE
PROCEEDS MUST BE MADE.
(f) ON RECEIPT OF PAYMENT OF THE SALE PROCEEDS, THE
DEPARTMENT SHALL ISSUE TO EACH QUALIFIED RETAILER A TAX CREDIT
CERTIFICATE. THE TAX CREDIT CERTIFICATE MUST STATE THE FOLLOWING:
(I) THE TOTAL AMOUNT OF TAX CREDITS THAT THE QUALIFIED
RETAILER MAY CLAIM;
(II) THE AMOUNT THAT THE QUALIFIED RETAILER HAS PAID OR
AGREED TO PAY IN RETURN FOR THE ISSUANCE OF THE TAX CREDIT
CERTIFICATES AND THE DATE OF THE PAYMENT;
(III) THE DATES ON WHICH THE TAX CREDITS WILL BE AVAILABLE
FOR USE BY THE QUALIFIED RETAILER;
(IV) ANY PENALTIES OR OTHER REMEDIES FOR NONCOMPLIANCE;
(V) THE SERIAL NUMBER OF THE TAX CREDIT CERTIFICATE; AND
(VI) ANY OTHER REQUIREMENTS DEEMED NECESSARY BY THE
DEPARTMENT AS A CONDITION OF ISSUING THE TAX CREDIT CERTIFICATE.
(g) (I) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL NOT ISSUE A TAX CREDIT
CERTIFICATE TO ANY QUALIFIED RETAILER THAT FAILS TO PROVIDE THE
TAX CREDIT SALE PROCEEDS WITHIN THE TIME SPECIFIED BY THE
DEPARTMENT.
(II) A QUALIFIED RETAILER THAT FAILS TO PROVIDE THE TAX
CREDIT SALE PROCEEDS WITHIN THE TIME SPECIFIED BY THE DEPARTMENT
IS SUBJECT TO A PENALTY EQUAL TO TEN PERCENT OF THE AMOUNT OF THE
-11- SB25B-009

PURCHASE PRICE THAT REMAINS UNPAID. THE PENALTY MUST BE PAID TO
THE DEPARTMENT WITHIN THIRTY DAYS AFTER DEMAND.
(III) THE DEPARTMENT MAY OFFER TO REALLOCATE THE
DEFAULTED TAX CREDITS AMONG OTHER QUALIFIED RETAILERS SO THAT
THE RESULT AFTER REALLOCATION IS THE SAME AS IF THE INITIAL
ALLOCATION HAD BEEN PERFORMED WITHOUT CONSIDERING THE TAX
CREDIT ALLOCATION TO THE DEFAULTING QUALIFIED RETAILER.
(IV) IF THE REALLOCATION OF TAX CREDITS UNDER SUBSECTION
(4.5)(g)(III) OF THIS SECTION RESULTS IN THE PAYMENT BY ANOTHER
QUALIFIED RETAILER OF THE AMOUNT OF TAX CREDIT SALE PROCEEDS NOT
PAID BY THE DEFAULTING QUALIFIED RETAILER, THE DEPARTMENT MAY
WAIVE THE PENALTY IMPOSED UNDER SUBSECTION (4.5)(g)(II) OF THIS
SECTION.
(V) A QUALIFIED RETAILER THAT FAILS TO PAY THE TAX CREDIT
SALE PROCEEDS WITHIN THE TIME SPECIFIED BY THE DEPARTMENT MAY
AVOID THE IMPOSITION OF THE PENALTY BY TRANSFERRING THE
ALLOCATION OF TAX CREDITS TO A NEW OR EXISTING QUALIFIED RETAILER
WITHIN THIRTY DAYS AFTER THE DUE DATE OF THE DEFAULTED
INSTALLMENT. ANY TRANSFEREE OF AN ALLOCATION OF TAX CREDITS OF
A DEFAULTING QUALIFIED RETAILER UNDER THIS SUBSECTION (4.5)(g)
SHALL AGREE TO PAY THE TAX CREDIT SALE PROCEEDS WITHIN FIVE DAYS
AFTER THE DATE OF THE TRANSFER.
(h) FOR A TAX CREDIT CERTIFICATE ISSUED IN FISCAL YEAR
2025-26, THE QUALIFIED RETAILER MAY CLAIM UP TO THE FULL AMOUNT
OF THE CREDIT AGAINST ITS INCOME TAX LIABILITY INCURRED FOR A
TAXABLE YEAR THAT BEGINS ON OR AFTER JANUARY 1, 2030; EXCEPT
THAT A QUALIFIED RETAILER MAY NOT REDUCE ITS ESTIMATED TAX
-12- SB25B-009

PAYMENTS IN PROPORTION TO SUCH CREDIT PRIOR TO JULY 1, 2030.
(i) (I) THE TOTAL CREDIT TO BE APPLIED BY A QUALIFIED RETAILER
IN ANY ONE YEAR MUST NOT EXCEED THE INCOME TAX LIABILITY OF THE
QUALIFIED RETAILER FOR THE TAXABLE YEAR. IF THE QUALIFIED RETAILER
CANNOT USE THE ENTIRE AMOUNT OF THE TAX CREDIT FOR THE TAXABLE
YEAR IN WHICH THE QUALIFIED RETAILER IS ELIGIBLE FOR THE CREDIT, THE
EXCESS MAY BE CARRIED OVER TO SUCCEEDING TAXABLE YEARS AND
USED AS A CREDIT AGAINST THE INCOME TAX LIABILITY OF THE QUALIFIED
RETAILER FOR THOSE TAXABLE YEARS; EXCEPT THAT, FOR A CREDIT
ISSUED IN FISCAL YEAR 2025-26, THE CREDIT MAY NOT BE CARRIED OVER
TO ANY TAXABLE YEAR THAT BEGINS AFTER DECEMBER 31, 2050.
(II) ANY AMOUNT OF THE CREDIT THAT IS NOT TIMELY CLAIMED
EXPIRES AND IS NOT REFUNDABLE.
(j) A QUALIFIED RETAILER CLAIMING A CREDIT UNDER THIS
SUBSECTION (4.5) SHALL SUBMIT THE TAX CREDIT CERTIFICATE WITH ITS
TAX RETURN.
(k) A QUALIFIED RETAILER CLAIMING A CREDIT UNDER THIS
SUBSECTION (4.5) SHALL NOT BE REQUIRED TO PAY ANY ADDITIONAL OR
RETALIATORY TAX AS A RESULT OF CLAIMING THE CREDIT.
(l) IF A QUALIFIED RETAILER HOLDING AN UNCLAIMED TAX CREDIT
IS PART OF A MERGER, ACQUISITION, OR LINE OF BUSINESS DIVESTITURE
TRANSACTION, THE TAX CREDIT MAY BE TRANSFERRED TO AND ASSUMED
BY THE RESULTING ENTITY IF THE RESULTING ENTITY IS A RETAILER
AUTHORIZED TO DO BUSINESS IN COLORADO THAT HAS INCOME TAX
LIABILITY. THE QUALIFIED RETAILER THAT ORIGINALLY PURCHASED THE
CREDIT AND THE RESULTING ENTITY SHALL NOTIFY THE DEPARTMENT IN
WRITING OF THE TRANSFER OR ASSUMPTION OF THE CREDIT IN
-13- SB25B-009

ACCORDANCE WITH PROCEDURES ADOPTED BY THE DEPARTMENT. THE
DEPARTMENT SHALL MAINTAIN A RECORD OF THE TRANSFER OR
ASSUMPTION OF THE TAX CREDIT. THE TRANSFER OR ASSUMPTION OF THE
TAX CREDIT DOES NOT AFFECT THE TIME SCHEDULE FOR CLAIMING THE
TAX CREDIT AS PROVIDED IN THIS SUBSECTION (4.5).
(5) Pursuant to section 39-21-304 (3), notwithstanding section
24-1-136 (11)(a)(I), and for the purpose of providing data that allows the
general assembly and the state auditor to measure the effectiveness of the
tax credit created in subsection (3) of this section, the department of
revenue, on or before January 1, 2025, and on or before January 1 of each
year thereafter through January 1, 2028, shall submit to the general
assembly and the state auditor a report detailing the sales of new,
electric-powered lawn equipment, as reported by a qualified retailer
claiming the tax credit authorized under subsection (3) of this section OR
A QUALIFIED RETAILER WHO HAS RECEIVED A TAX CREDIT CERTIFICATE
PURSUANT TO SUBSECTION (4.5) OF THIS SECTION. The tax credit
established in this section meets its purpose if sales of new,
gasoline-powered lawn equipment are significantly reduced within five
years after the tax credit becomes effective, as determined by the general
assembly and the state auditor pursuant to section 39-21-304 (3).
(6) This section is repealed, effective December 31, 2033
DECEMBER 31, 2055.
SECTION 5. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 39-22-554, amend
(3)(a), (3)(c), (4), (8), and (9); repeal (3)(f); and add (4.3) and (4.5) as
follows:
39-22-554. Heat pump technology and thermal energy
network tax credit - sale of tax credits - authorization to issue - tax
-14- SB25B-009

preference performance statement - legislative declaration -
definitions - repeal. (3) (a) For income tax years commencing on or
after January 1, 2024, but before January 1, 2033 JANUARY 1, 2026, an
eligible taxpayer that installs heat pump technology in a building in the
state, on a campus in the state, or develops, through purchase and
installation of necessary equipment, a thermal energy network in the state
is allowed a credit against the tax imposed under this article 22 in an
amount set forth in subsection (3)(c) of this section in the tax year that the
heat pump technology or thermal energy network is placed into service.
(c) Subject to the modifications set forth in subsection (3)(d) of
this section and the annual review required pursuant to subsection (3)(e)
of this section, and except as otherwise provided in subsection (3)(f) of
this section, the amount of the credit allowed pursuant to this section is
calculated as follows:
(I) For the installation of an air-source heat pump system or for a
variable refrigerant flow heat pump system,
(A) for tax years commencing on or after January 1, 2024, but
before January 1, 2026, one thousand five hundred dollars;
(B) For tax years commencing on or after January 1, 2026, but
before January 1, 2029, one thousand dollars; and
(C) For tax years commencing on or after January 1, 2029, but
before January 1, 2033, five hundred dollars;
(II) For the installation of a ground-source heat pump system,
water-source heat pump system, a combined air-source and ground-source
heat pump system, a combined water-source and ground-source heat
pump system, a combined variable refrigerant flow and ground-source
heat pump system, or a combined variable refrigerant flow and
-15- SB25B-009

water-source heat pump system,
(A) for tax years commencing on or after January 1, 2024, but
before January 1, 2026, three thousand dollars; AND
(B) For tax years commencing on or after January 1, 2026, but
before January 1, 2029, two thousand dollars; and
(C) For tax years commencing on or after January 1, 2029, but
before January 1, 2033, one thousand dollars; and
(III) For the installation of a heat pump water heater,
(A) for tax years commencing on or after January 1, 2024, but
before January 1, 2026, five hundred dollars. and
(B) For tax years commencing on or after January 1, 2026, but
before January 1, 2033, two hundred fifty dollars.
(f) If the June 2025 revenue forecast, and each June revenue
forecast through the June 2031 revenue forecast as prepared by either
legislative council staff or the office of state planning and budgeting,
projects that state revenues, as defined in section 24-77-103.6 (6)(c), will
not increase by at least four percent for the next fiscal year, the amount
of the credit allowed pursuant to subsection (3)(c)(I)(B), (3)(c)(I)(C),
(3)(c)(II)(B), (3)(c)(II)(C), or (3)(c)(III)(B) of this section, as may be
modified by subsections (3)(d) and (3)(e) of this section, for any tax year
commencing in the calendar year that begins during said next fiscal year
is reduced by fifty percent if the heat pump technology is installed at an
existing residential or nonresidential building; except that if the amount
of the reduced credit is equal to or less than two hundred fifty dollars,
then no credit is available for such a tax year.
(4) An eligible taxpayer may retain an applicable percentage of
the amount of the tax credit allowed under subsection (3)(c) of this
-16- SB25B-009

section to support the industry-wide adoption and deployment of heat
pump technologies in the state. The office shall annually determine the
applicable percentage, which must be the same for each eligible taxpayer,
pursuant to guidelines established by the office. The office shall maintain
the current applicable percentage on its website and shall provide the
applicable percentage in writing to the department no later than December
31, 2023, and each December 31 thereafter through December 31, 2031
DECEMBER 31, 2024.
(4.3) THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY FINDS AND DECLARES THAT:
(a) THE TAX CREDITS AUTHORIZED BY SUBSECTION (4.5) OF THIS
SECTION AS A METHOD TO PROVIDE MONEY TO THE GENERAL FUND ARE
AVAILABLE ONLY TO ELIGIBLE TAXPAYERS THAT INCUR INCOME TAX
LIABILITY IN THE STATE;
(b) THE TAX CREDITS CAN ONLY BE USED BY AN ELIGIBLE
TAXPAYER TO OFFSET INCOME TAX LIABILITY ACTUALLY INCURRED BY THE
TAXPAYER;
(c) THE TAX CREDITS ARE NOT REFUNDABLE AND DO NOT IMPOSE
AN OBLIGATION OF PAYMENT IN ANY FUTURE YEAR UPON THE STATE;
(d) THE USE OF PROCEEDS FROM THE SALE OF THE TAX CREDITS
FOR THE GENERAL FUND ALLOWS THE STATE TO AUGMENT THE GENERAL
FUND THROUGH THE USE OF FUTURE TAX EXPENDITURES AND THEREFORE:
(I) DOES NOT REQUIRE THE STATE TO BORROW MONEY, EXTEND OR
PLEDGE THE STATE'S CREDIT, OR OBLIGATE THE STATE TO MAKE FUTURE
PAYMENTS FROM STATE REVENUES; AND
(II) DOES NOT OTHERWISE CREATE ANY MULTIPLE FISCAL YEAR
DIRECT OR INDIRECT DISTRICT DEBT OR OTHER FINANCIAL OBLIGATION
WHATSOEVER FOR PURPOSES OF SECTION 20 (4)(a) OF ARTICLE X OF THE
-17- SB25B-009

STATE CONSTITUTION.
(4.5) (a) AN ELIGIBLE TAXPAYER MAY PURCHASE TAX CREDITS
FROM THE DEPARTMENT IN ACCORDANCE WITH THIS SECTION AND MAY
APPLY THE TAX CREDITS AGAINST ITS LIABILITY FOR THE TAX IMPOSED
PURSUANT TO THIS ARTICLE 22, IN ACCORDANCE WITH THIS SUBSECTION
(4.5).
(b) (I) THE DEPARTMENT IS AUTHORIZED TO ISSUE TAX CREDIT
CERTIFICATES TO ELIGIBLE TAXPAYERS EQUAL TO THE LESSER OF A TOTAL
FACE VALUE OF UP TO FORTY MILLION DOLLARS OR TOTAL SALES
PROCEEDS OF UP TO THIRTY MILLION DOLLARS IN FISCAL YEAR 2025-26.
(II) THE DEPARTMENT MAY CONTRACT WITH AN INDEPENDENT
THIRD PARTY TO CONDUCT OR CONSULT ON A BIDDING PROCESS AMONG
ELIGIBLE TAXPAYERS TO PURCHASE THE TAX CREDITS.
(III) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL CONSULT WITH THE OFFICE IN
ADVANCE OF ISSUING ANY TAX CREDITS IN ACCORDANCE WITH THIS
SUBSECTION (4.5).
(c) AN ELIGIBLE TAXPAYER SEEKING TO PURCHASE TAX CREDITS
MUST APPLY TO THE DEPARTMENT IN THE MANNER PRESCRIBED BY THE
DEPARTMENT.
(d) USING PROCEDURES ADOPTED BY THE DEPARTMENT OR, IF
APPLICABLE, BY AN INDEPENDENT THIRD PARTY, EACH ELIGIBLE TAXPAYER
THAT SUBMITS AN APPLICATION SHALL MAKE A TIMELY AND IRREVOCABLE
OFFER, CONTINGENT ONLY UPON THE DEPARTMENT'S ISSUANCE TO THE
ELIGIBLE TAXPAYER OF THE TAX CREDIT CERTIFICATES, TO MAKE A
SPECIFIED PURCHASE PAYMENT AMOUNT TO THE DEPARTMENT ON DATES
SPECIFIED BY THE DEPARTMENT. THE OFFER MUST INCLUDE THE
FOLLOWING:
-18- SB25B-009

(I) THE REQUESTED AMOUNT OF TAX CREDITS, WHICH MUST NOT
BE LESS THAN ANY MINIMUM AMOUNT ESTABLISHED IN PROCEDURES BY
THE DEPARTMENT OR, IF APPLICABLE, THE INDEPENDENT THIRD PARTY;
(II) THE ELIGIBLE TAXPAYER'S PROPOSED TAX CREDIT PURCHASE
AMOUNT FOR EACH TAX CREDIT DOLLAR REQUESTED. THE MINIMUM
PROPOSED TAX CREDIT PURCHASE AMOUNT MUST BE EITHER:
(A) THE PERCENTAGE OF THE REQUESTED DOLLAR AMOUNT OF TAX
CREDITS THAT THE DEPARTMENT OR, IF APPLICABLE, THE INDEPENDENT
THIRD PARTY DETERMINES TO BE CONSISTENT WITH MARKET CONDITIONS
AS OF THE OFFER DATE; OR
(B) IF NO AMOUNT IS ESTABLISHED BY THE DEPARTMENT OR THE
INDEPENDENT THIRD PARTY PURSUANT TO SUBSECTION (4.5)(d)(II)(A) OF
THIS SECTION, SEVENTY-FIVE PERCENT OF THE REQUESTED DOLLAR
AMOUNT OF TAX CREDITS; AND
(III) ANY OTHER INFORMATION THAT THE DEPARTMENT OR, IF
APPLICABLE, THE INDEPENDENT THIRD PARTY REQUIRES.
(e) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL PROVIDE WRITTEN NOTICE TO EACH
ELIGIBLE TAXPAYER THAT SUBMITS AN APPLICATION INDICATING WHETHER
OR NOT THE ELIGIBLE TAXPAYER HAS BEEN APPROVED AS A PURCHASER OF
TAX CREDITS AND, IF SO, THE AMOUNT OF TAX CREDITS ALLOCATED AND
THE DATE BY WHICH PAYMENT OF THE TAX CREDIT SALE PROCEEDS MUST
BE MADE.
(f) ON RECEIPT OF PAYMENT OF THE SALE PROCEEDS, THE
DEPARTMENT SHALL ISSUE TO EACH ELIGIBLE TAXPAYER A TAX CREDIT
CERTIFICATE. THE TAX CREDIT CERTIFICATE MUST STATE THE FOLLOWING:
(I) THE TOTAL AMOUNT OF TAX CREDITS THAT THE ELIGIBLE
TAXPAYER MAY CLAIM;
-19- SB25B-009

(II) THE AMOUNT THAT THE ELIGIBLE TAXPAYER HAS PAID OR
AGREED TO PAY IN RETURN FOR THE ISSUANCE OF THE TAX CREDIT
CERTIFICATES AND THE DATE OF THE PAYMENT;
(III) THE DATES ON WHICH THE TAX CREDITS WILL BE AVAILABLE
FOR USE BY THE ELIGIBLE TAXPAYER;
(IV) ANY PENALTIES OR OTHER REMEDIES FOR NONCOMPLIANCE;
(V) THE SERIAL NUMBER OF THE TAX CREDIT CERTIFICATE; AND
(VI) ANY OTHER REQUIREMENTS DEEMED NECESSARY BY THE
DEPARTMENT AS A CONDITION OF ISSUING THE TAX CREDIT CERTIFICATE.
(g) (I) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL NOT ISSUE A TAX CREDIT
CERTIFICATE TO ANY ELIGIBLE TAXPAYER THAT FAILS TO PROVIDE THE TAX
CREDIT SALE PROCEEDS WITHIN THE TIME SPECIFIED BY THE DEPARTMENT.
(II) AN ELIGIBLE TAXPAYER THAT FAILS TO PROVIDE THE TAX
CREDIT SALE PROCEEDS WITHIN THE TIME SPECIFIED BY THE DEPARTMENT
IS SUBJECT TO A PENALTY EQUAL TO TEN PERCENT OF THE AMOUNT OF THE
PURCHASE PRICE THAT REMAINS UNPAID. THE PENALTY MUST BE PAID TO
THE DEPARTMENT WITHIN THIRTY DAYS AFTER DEMAND.
(III) THE DEPARTMENT MAY OFFER TO REALLOCATE THE
DEFAULTED TAX CREDITS AMONG OTHER ELIGIBLE TAXPAYER SO THAT THE
RESULT AFTER REALLOCATION IS THE SAME AS IF THE INITIAL ALLOCATION
HAD BEEN PERFORMED WITHOUT CONSIDERING THE TAX CREDIT
ALLOCATION TO THE DEFAULTING ELIGIBLE TAXPAYER.
(IV) IF THE REALLOCATION OF TAX CREDITS UNDER SUBSECTION
(4.5)(g)(III) OF THIS SECTION RESULTS IN THE PAYMENT BY ANOTHER
ELIGIBLE TAXPAYER OF THE AMOUNT OF TAX CREDIT SALE PROCEEDS NOT
PAID BY THE DEFAULTING ELIGIBLE TAXPAYER, THE DEPARTMENT MAY
WAIVE THE PENALTY IMPOSED UNDER SUBSECTION (4.5)(g)(II) OF THIS
-20- SB25B-009

SECTION.
(V) AN ELIGIBLE TAXPAYER THAT FAILS TO PAY THE TAX CREDIT
SALE PROCEEDS WITHIN THE TIME SPECIFIED BY THE DEPARTMENT MAY
AVOID THE IMPOSITION OF THE PENALTY BY TRANSFERRING THE
ALLOCATION OF TAX CREDITS TO A NEW OR EXISTING ELIGIBLE TAXPAYER
WITHIN THIRTY DAYS AFTER THE DUE DATE OF THE DEFAULTED
INSTALLMENT. ANY TRANSFEREE OF AN ALLOCATION OF TAX CREDITS OF
A DEFAULTING ELIGIBLE TAXPAYER UNDER THIS SUBSECTION (4.5)(g)
SHALL AGREE TO PAY THE TAX CREDIT SALE PROCEEDS WITHIN FIVE DAYS
AFTER THE DATE OF THE TRANSFER.
(h) FOR A TAX CREDIT CERTIFICATE ISSUED IN FISCAL YEAR
2025-26, THE ELIGIBLE TAXPAYER MAY CLAIM UP TO THE FULL AMOUNT
OF THE CREDIT AGAINST ITS INCOME TAX LIABILITY INCURRED FOR A
TAXABLE YEAR THAT BEGINS ON OR AFTER JANUARY 1, 2030; EXCEPT
THAT A TAXPAYER MAY NOT REDUCE ITS ESTIMATED TAX PAYMENTS IN
PROPORTION TO SUCH CREDIT PRIOR TO JULY 1, 2030.
(i) (I) THE TOTAL CREDIT TO BE APPLIED BY AN ELIGIBLE
TAXPAYER IN ANY ONE YEAR MUST NOT EXCEED THE INCOME TAX
LIABILITY OF THE TAXPAYER FOR THE TAXABLE YEAR. IF THE ELIGIBLE
TAXPAYER CANNOT USE THE ENTIRE AMOUNT OF THE TAX CREDIT FOR THE
TAXABLE YEAR IN WHICH THE TAXPAYER IS ELIGIBLE FOR THE CREDIT, THE
EXCESS MAY BE CARRIED OVER TO SUCCEEDING TAXABLE YEARS AND
USED AS A CREDIT AGAINST THE INCOME TAX LIABILITY OF THE ELIGIBLE
TAXPAYER FOR THOSE TAXABLE YEARS; EXCEPT THAT, FOR A CREDIT
ISSUED IN FISCAL YEAR 2025-26, THE CREDIT MAY NOT BE CARRIED OVER
TO ANY TAXABLE YEAR THAT BEGINS AFTER DECEMBER 31, 2050.
(II) ANY AMOUNT OF THE CREDIT THAT IS NOT TIMELY CLAIMED
-21- SB25B-009

EXPIRES AND IS NOT REFUNDABLE.
(j) AN ELIGIBLE TAXPAYER CLAIMING A CREDIT UNDER THIS
SUBSECTION (4.5) SHALL SUBMIT THE TAX CREDIT CERTIFICATE WITH ITS
TAX RETURN.
(k) AN ELIGIBLE TAXPAYER CLAIMING A CREDIT UNDER THIS
SUBSECTION (4.5) SHALL NOT BE REQUIRED TO PAY ANY ADDITIONAL OR
RETALIATORY TAX AS A RESULT OF CLAIMING THE CREDIT.
(l) IF AN ELIGIBLE TAXPAYER HOLDING AN UNCLAIMED TAX CREDIT
IS PART OF A MERGER, ACQUISITION, OR LINE OF BUSINESS DIVESTITURE
TRANSACTION, THE TAX CREDIT MAY BE TRANSFERRED TO AND ASSUMED
BY THE RESULTING ENTITY IF THE RESULTING ENTITY IS AN ELIGIBLE
TAXPAYER THAT HAS INCOME TAX LIABILITY. THE ELIGIBLE TAXPAYER
THAT ORIGINALLY PURCHASED THE CREDIT AND THE RESULTING ENTITY
SHALL NOTIFY THE DEPARTMENT IN WRITING OF THE TRANSFER OR
ASSUMPTION OF THE CREDIT IN ACCORDANCE WITH PROCEDURES ADOPTED
BY THE DEPARTMENT. THE DEPARTMENT SHALL MAINTAIN A RECORD OF
THE TRANSFER OR ASSUMPTION OF THE TAX CREDIT. THE TRANSFER OR
ASSUMPTION OF THE TAX CREDIT DOES NOT AFFECT THE TIME SCHEDULE
FOR CLAIMING THE TAX CREDIT AS PROVIDED IN THIS SUBSECTION (4.5).
(8) If a credit authorized by SUBSECTION (3) OF this section
exceeds the income tax due on the income of the eligible taxpayer for the
taxable year, the excess credit may not be carried forward and must be
refunded to the eligible taxpayer or the installer.
(9) This section is repealed, effective December 31, 2038
DECEMBER 31, 2055.
SECTION 6. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 39-22-555, amend
(3)(a), (3)(e)(II), (5), and (8); repeal (6); and add (5.3) and (5.5) as
-22- SB25B-009

follows:
39-22-555. Electric bicycle tax credit - sale of tax credits -
authorization to issue - tax preference performance statement -
legislative declaration - definitions - repeal. (3) (a) Except as otherwise
provided in subsection (6) of this section, For income tax years
commencing on or after January 1, 2024, but before January 1, 2033
JANUARY 1, 2026, a qualified retailer is allowed a credit against the tax
imposed pursuant to this article 22 in an amount equal to five hundred
dollars for each retail sale of new qualified electric bicycles sold in the
state during the income tax year to a qualified purchaser; except that for
the income tax year commencing on January 1, 2024, the credit is allowed
only for retail sales made on or after April 1, 2024, but on or before
December 31, 2024.
(e) (II) For THE income tax years YEAR commencing on or after
January 1, 2025, BUT BEFORE JANUARY 1, 2026, the qualified retailer may
elect advance payments of the credit allowed pursuant to this section as
specified in section 39-22-629.
(5) If a credit authorized by SUBSECTION (3) OF this section
exceeds the income tax due on the income of the qualified retailer for the
taxable year, the excess credit may not be carried forward and must be
refunded to the qualified retailer.
(5.3) THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY FINDS AND DECLARES THAT:
(a) THE TAX CREDITS AUTHORIZED BY SUBSECTION (5.5) OF THIS
SECTION AS A METHOD TO PROVIDE MONEY TO THE GENERAL FUND ARE
AVAILABLE ONLY TO QUALIFIED RETAILERS THAT INCUR INCOME TAX
LIABILITY IN THE STATE;
(b) THE TAX CREDITS CAN ONLY BE USED BY A QUALIFIED
-23- SB25B-009

RETAILER TO OFFSET INCOME TAX LIABILITY ACTUALLY INCURRED BY THE
RETAILER;
(c) THE TAX CREDITS ARE NOT REFUNDABLE AND DO NOT IMPOSE
AN OBLIGATION OF PAYMENT IN ANY FUTURE YEAR UPON THE STATE;
(d) THE USE OF PROCEEDS FROM THE SALE OF THE TAX CREDITS
FOR THE GENERAL FUND ALLOWS THE STATE TO AUGMENT THE GENERAL
FUND THROUGH THE USE OF FUTURE TAX EXPENDITURES AND THEREFORE:
(I) DOES NOT REQUIRE THE STATE TO BORROW MONEY, EXTEND OR
PLEDGE THE STATE'S CREDIT, OR OBLIGATE THE STATE TO MAKE FUTURE
PAYMENTS FROM STATE REVENUES; AND
(II) DOES NOT OTHERWISE CREATE ANY MULTIPLE FISCAL YEAR
DIRECT OR INDIRECT DISTRICT DEBT OR OTHER FINANCIAL OBLIGATION
WHATSOEVER FOR PURPOSES OF SECTION 20 (4)(a) OF ARTICLE X OF THE
STATE CONSTITUTION.
(5.5) (a) A QUALIFIED RETAILER MAY PURCHASE TAX CREDITS
FROM THE DEPARTMENT IN ACCORDANCE WITH THIS SECTION AND MAY
APPLY THE TAX CREDITS AGAINST ITS LIABILITY FOR THE TAX IMPOSED
PURSUANT TO THIS ARTICLE 22, IN ACCORDANCE WITH THIS SUBSECTION
(5.5).
(b) (I) THE DEPARTMENT IS AUTHORIZED TO ISSUE TAX CREDIT
CERTIFICATES TO QUALIFIED RETAILERS EQUAL TO THE LESSER OF A TOTAL
FACE VALUE OF UP TO FORTY MILLION DOLLARS OR TOTAL SALES
PROCEEDS OF UP TO THIRTY MILLION DOLLARS IN FISCAL YEAR 2025-26.
(II) THE DEPARTMENT MAY CONTRACT WITH AN INDEPENDENT
THIRD PARTY TO CONDUCT OR CONSULT ON A BIDDING PROCESS AMONG
QUALIFIED RETAILERS TO PURCHASE THE TAX CREDITS.
(III) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL CONSULT WITH THE OFFICE IN
-24- SB25B-009

ADVANCE OF ISSUING ANY TAX CREDITS IN ACCORDANCE WITH THIS
SUBSECTION (5.5).
(c) A QUALIFIED RETAILER SEEKING TO PURCHASE TAX CREDITS
MUST APPLY TO THE DEPARTMENT IN THE MANNER PRESCRIBED BY THE
DEPARTMENT.
(d) USING PROCEDURES ADOPTED BY THE DEPARTMENT OR, IF
APPLICABLE, BY AN INDEPENDENT THIRD PARTY, EACH QUALIFIED
RETAILER THAT SUBMITS AN APPLICATION SHALL MAKE A TIMELY AND
IRREVOCABLE OFFER, CONTINGENT ONLY UPON THE DEPARTMENT'S
ISSUANCE TO THE QUALIFIED RETAILER OF THE TAX CREDIT CERTIFICATES,
TO MAKE A SPECIFIED PURCHASE PAYMENT AMOUNT TO THE DEPARTMENT
ON DATES SPECIFIED BY THE DEPARTMENT. THE OFFER MUST INCLUDE THE
FOLLOWING:
(I) THE REQUESTED AMOUNT OF TAX CREDITS, WHICH MUST NOT
BE LESS THAN ANY MINIMUM AMOUNT ESTABLISHED IN PROCEDURES BY
THE DEPARTMENT OR, IF APPLICABLE, THE INDEPENDENT THIRD PARTY;
(II) THE QUALIFIED RETAILER'S PROPOSED TAX CREDIT PURCHASE
AMOUNT FOR EACH TAX CREDIT DOLLAR REQUESTED. THE MINIMUM
PROPOSED TAX CREDIT PURCHASE AMOUNT MUST BE EITHER:
(A) THE PERCENTAGE OF THE REQUESTED DOLLAR AMOUNT OF TAX
CREDITS THAT THE DEPARTMENT OR, IF APPLICABLE, THE INDEPENDENT
THIRD PARTY DETERMINES TO BE CONSISTENT WITH MARKET CONDITIONS
AS OF THE OFFER DATE; OR
(B) IF NO AMOUNT IS ESTABLISHED BY THE DEPARTMENT OR THE
INDEPENDENT THIRD PARTY PURSUANT TO SUBSECTION (5.5)(d)(II)(A) OF
THIS SECTION, SEVENTY-FIVE PERCENT OF THE REQUESTED DOLLAR
AMOUNT OF TAX CREDITS; AND
-25- SB25B-009

(III) ANY OTHER INFORMATION THAT THE DEPARTMENT OR, IF
APPLICABLE, THE INDEPENDENT THIRD PARTY REQUIRES.
(e) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL PROVIDE WRITTEN NOTICE TO EACH
QUALIFIED RETAILER THAT SUBMITS AN APPLICATION INDICATING
WHETHER OR NOT THE QUALIFIED RETAILER HAS BEEN APPROVED AS A
PURCHASER OF TAX CREDITS AND, IF SO, THE AMOUNT OF TAX CREDITS
ALLOCATED AND THE DATE BY WHICH PAYMENT OF THE TAX CREDIT SALE
PROCEEDS MUST BE MADE.
(f) ON RECEIPT OF PAYMENT OF THE SALE PROCEEDS, THE
DEPARTMENT SHALL ISSUE TO EACH QUALIFIED RETAILER A TAX CREDIT
CERTIFICATE. THE TAX CREDIT CERTIFICATE MUST STATE THE FOLLOWING:
(I) THE TOTAL AMOUNT OF TAX CREDITS THAT THE QUALIFIED
RETAILER MAY CLAIM;
(II) THE AMOUNT THAT THE QUALIFIED RETAILER HAS PAID OR
AGREED TO PAY IN RETURN FOR THE ISSUANCE OF THE TAX CREDIT
CERTIFICATES AND THE DATE OF THE PAYMENT;
(III) THE DATES ON WHICH THE TAX CREDITS WILL BE AVAILABLE
FOR USE BY THE QUALIFIED RETAILER;
(IV) ANY PENALTIES OR OTHER REMEDIES FOR NONCOMPLIANCE;
(V) THE SERIAL NUMBER OF THE TAX CREDIT CERTIFICATE; AND
(VI) ANY OTHER REQUIREMENTS DEEMED NECESSARY BY THE
DEPARTMENT AS A CONDITION OF ISSUING THE TAX CREDIT CERTIFICATE.
(g) (I) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL NOT ISSUE A TAX CREDIT
CERTIFICATE TO ANY QUALIFIED RETAILER THAT FAILS TO PROVIDE THE
TAX CREDIT SALE PROCEEDS WITHIN THE TIME SPECIFIED BY THE
DEPARTMENT.
(II) A QUALIFIED RETAILER THAT FAILS TO PROVIDE THE TAX
-26- SB25B-009

CREDIT SALE PROCEEDS WITHIN THE TIME SPECIFIED BY THE DEPARTMENT
IS SUBJECT TO A PENALTY EQUAL TO TEN PERCENT OF THE AMOUNT OF THE
PURCHASE PRICE THAT REMAINS UNPAID. THE PENALTY MUST BE PAID TO
THE DEPARTMENT WITHIN THIRTY DAYS AFTER DEMAND.
(III) THE DEPARTMENT MAY OFFER TO REALLOCATE THE
DEFAULTED TAX CREDITS AMONG OTHER QUALIFIED RETAILERS SO THAT
THE RESULT AFTER REALLOCATION IS THE SAME AS IF THE INITIAL
ALLOCATION HAD BEEN PERFORMED WITHOUT CONSIDERING THE TAX
CREDIT ALLOCATION TO THE DEFAULTING QUALIFIED RETAILER.
(IV) IF THE REALLOCATION OF TAX CREDITS UNDER SUBSECTION
(5.5)(g)(III) OF THIS SECTION RESULTS IN THE PAYMENT BY ANOTHER
QUALIFIED RETAILER OF THE AMOUNT OF TAX CREDIT SALE PROCEEDS NOT
PAID BY THE DEFAULTING QUALIFIED RETAILER, THE DEPARTMENT MAY
WAIVE THE PENALTY IMPOSED UNDER SUBSECTION (5.5)(g)(II) OF THIS
SECTION.
(V) A QUALIFIED RETAILER THAT FAILS TO PAY THE TAX CREDIT
SALE PROCEEDS WITHIN THE TIME SPECIFIED BY THE DEPARTMENT MAY
AVOID THE IMPOSITION OF THE PENALTY BY TRANSFERRING THE
ALLOCATION OF TAX CREDITS TO A NEW OR EXISTING QUALIFIED RETAILER
WITHIN THIRTY DAYS AFTER THE DUE DATE OF THE DEFAULTED
INSTALLMENT. ANY TRANSFEREE OF AN ALLOCATION OF TAX CREDITS OF
A DEFAULTING QUALIFIED RETAILER UNDER THIS SUBSECTION (5.5)(g)
SHALL AGREE TO PAY THE TAX CREDIT SALE PROCEEDS WITHIN FIVE DAYS
AFTER THE DATE OF THE TRANSFER.
(h) FOR A TAX CREDIT CERTIFICATE ISSUED IN FISCAL YEAR
2025-26, THE QUALIFIED RETAILER MAY CLAIM UP TO THE FULL AMOUNT
OF THE CREDIT AGAINST ITS INCOME TAX LIABILITY INCURRED FOR A
-27- SB25B-009

TAXABLE YEAR THAT BEGINS ON OR AFTER JANUARY 1, 2030; EXCEPT
THAT A QUALIFIED RETAILER MAY NOT REDUCE ITS ESTIMATED TAX
PAYMENTS IN PROPORTION TO SUCH CREDIT PRIOR TO JULY 1, 2030.
(i) (I) THE TOTAL CREDIT TO BE APPLIED BY A QUALIFIED RETAILER
IN ANY ONE YEAR MUST NOT EXCEED THE INCOME TAX LIABILITY OF THE
QUALIFIED RETAILER FOR THE TAXABLE YEAR. IF THE QUALIFIED RETAILER
CANNOT USE THE ENTIRE AMOUNT OF THE TAX CREDIT FOR THE TAXABLE
YEAR IN WHICH THE QUALIFIED RETAILER IS ELIGIBLE FOR THE CREDIT, THE
EXCESS MAY BE CARRIED OVER TO SUCCEEDING TAXABLE YEARS AND
USED AS A CREDIT AGAINST THE INCOME TAX LIABILITY OF THE QUALIFIED
RETAILER FOR THOSE TAXABLE YEARS; EXCEPT THAT, FOR A CREDIT
ISSUED IN FISCAL YEAR 2025-26, THE CREDIT MAY NOT BE CARRIED OVER
TO ANY TAXABLE YEAR THAT BEGINS AFTER DECEMBER 31, 2050.
(II) ANY AMOUNT OF THE CREDIT THAT IS NOT TIMELY CLAIMED
EXPIRES AND IS NOT REFUNDABLE.
(j) A QUALIFIED RETAILER CLAIMING A CREDIT UNDER THIS
SUBSECTION (5.5) SHALL SUBMIT THE TAX CREDIT CERTIFICATE WITH ITS
TAX RETURN.
(k) A QUALIFIED RETAILER CLAIMING A CREDIT UNDER THIS
SUBSECTION (5.5) SHALL NOT BE REQUIRED TO PAY ANY ADDITIONAL OR
RETALIATORY TAX AS A RESULT OF CLAIMING THE CREDIT.
(l) IF A QUALIFIED RETAILER HOLDING AN UNCLAIMED TAX CREDIT
IS PART OF A MERGER, ACQUISITION, OR LINE OF BUSINESS DIVESTITURE
TRANSACTION, THE TAX CREDIT MAY BE TRANSFERRED TO AND ASSUMED
BY THE RESULTING ENTITY IF THE RESULTING ENTITY IS AN RETAILER
AUTHORIZED TO DO BUSINESS IN COLORADO THAT HAS INCOME TAX
LIABILITY. THE QUALIFIED RETAILER THAT ORIGINALLY PURCHASED THE
-28- SB25B-009

CREDIT AND THE RESULTING ENTITY SHALL NOTIFY THE DEPARTMENT IN
WRITING OF THE TRANSFER OR ASSUMPTION OF THE CREDIT IN
ACCORDANCE WITH PROCEDURES ADOPTED BY THE DEPARTMENT. THE
DEPARTMENT SHALL MAINTAIN A RECORD OF THE TRANSFER OR
ASSUMPTION OF THE TAX CREDIT. THE TRANSFER OR ASSUMPTION OF THE
TAX CREDIT DOES NOT AFFECT THE TIME SCHEDULE FOR CLAIMING THE
TAX CREDIT AS PROVIDED IN THIS SUBSECTION (5.5).
(6) If the June 2025 revenue forecast, and each June revenue
forecast through the June 2031 revenue forecast as prepared by either
legislative council staff or the office of state planning and budgeting,
projects that state revenues, as defined in section 24-77-103.6 (6)(c), will
not increase by at least four percent for the next fiscal year, the amount
of the credit allowed pursuant to this section, the discount required
pursuant to subsection (3)(b) of this section, and the administrative fee
allowed pursuant to subsection (3)(d) of this section for any tax year
commencing in the calendar year that begins during said next fiscal year,
is reduced by fifty percent.
(8) This section is repealed, effective December 31, 2038
DECEMBER 31, 2055.
SECTION 7. Safety clause. The general assembly finds,
determines, and declares that this act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety or for appropriations for
the support and maintenance of the departments of the state and state
institutions.
-29- SB25B-009